Indiana, session 2026, HB1107.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-19-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13. State Bullying Ombudsman
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "ombudsman" refers to the state
bullying ombudsman appointed under section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) A state bullying ombudsman position is established
within the department.
(b) The secretary of education shall appoint the ombudsman.
The secretary shall appoint a successor ombudsman not later than
thirty (30) days after the date a vacancy in the position of the
ombudsman occurs.
Sec. 3. (a) The ombudsman shall do the following:
(1) Receive complaints from parents regarding unresolved
bullying or physical assault incidents by a student against
another student.
(2) Provide technical assistance and procedural guidance to
2026 IN 1107—LS 6492/DI 110


school corporations and families regarding bullying and
physical assault.
(3) Serve as a neutral liaison to promote fair resolution of
complaints described in subdivision (1).
(4) Monitor trends in complaint data and identify patterns of
noncompliance with bullying or physical assault laws, rules,
and policies, as applicable.
(b) The ombudsman shall do the following annually:
(1) Create a report that:
(A) summarizes the volume and outcomes of bullying
complaints to the ombudsman; and
(B) includes any policy recommendations by the
ombudsman.
(2) Submit the report to the general assembly in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 4. The department shall provide staff and administrative
support to the ombudsman.
Sec. 5. The department shall post the ombudsman's contact
information on the department's website.
Sec. 6. Each school corporation shall include the ombudsman's
contact information in the school corporation's:
(1) discipline rules adopted under IC 20-33-8-13.5;
(2) bullying policy, as applicable; and
(3) notice to a parent of a targeted student (as defined
IC 20-33-8.3-2) regarding a bullying or physical assault
incident.
SECTION 2. IC 20-33-8.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8.3. School Corporation Bullying Oversight Committee
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "committee" refers to a bullying
oversight committee established by a school corporation under
section 3 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "targeted student" is a student
who is an alleged victim of bullying or physical assault by another
student.
Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided under subsection (d), each school
corporation shall establish a bullying oversight committee for the
purpose of reviewing parent complaints submitted under section
4 of this chapter.
(b) Except as provided under subsections (c) and (d), the
committee must be composed of at least three (3) employees from
2026 IN 1107—LS 6492/DI 110


each school maintained by the school corporation who:
(1) agree voluntarily to serve on the committee; and
(2) are appointed by the:
(A) superintendent of the school corporation; or
(B) principal of the applicable school.
An administrator of the school corporation or a school may not be
a member of the committee.
(c) If there is an insufficient number of employees described in
subsection (b) to serve as members of the committee, the
superintendent or principal shall appoint at least two (2) employees
described in subsection (b) from each school maintained by the
school corporation to serve as members of the committee.
(d) If there is an insufficient number of employees described in
subsections (b) and (c) to serve as members of the committee, the
school corporation is not required to establish a committee.
Sec. 4. A parent of a targeted student enrolled in a school
corporation may submit a complaint to the committee of the school
corporation if the parent believes that:
(1) the school administration has failed to investigate a
bullying or physical assault incident involving the targeted
student; or
(2) the resolution of an incident described in subdivision (1)
was insufficient or ineffective.
Sec. 5. (a) A committee shall do the following:
(1) Receive complaints submitted by parents under section 4
of this chapter.
(2) Assign a complaint received by a parent described in
section 4 of this chapter to two (2) members of the committee
who work in one (1) or more school buildings other than the
school building in which the incident of the complaint
occurred to do the following:
(A) Jointly investigate the complaint.
(B) Review the initial school investigation and response,
including reviewing all relevant evidence.
(C) Interview witnesses, staff, or other individuals as
necessary.
(D) Confer with the parent who filed the complaint
regarding the adequacy of the resolution by the school.
(E) Prepare and submit to the committee an initial report
of findings and recommendations regarding the complaint,
investigation, and resolution.
(3) Review and amend, as applicable, the report submitted
2026 IN 1107—LS 6492/DI 110


under subdivision (2)(E).
(4) Approve a final report of findings and recommendations
regarding a complaint, investigation, and resolution.
(b) A committee shall do the following with regard to a report
required under subsection (a)(4):
(1) Complete the investigation and report not later than thirty
(30) calendar days after the date the complaint was submitted
to the committee.
(2) In compliance with any applicable privacy laws, provide
a copy of the report to the following:
(A) The governing body of the school corporation.
(B) The superintendent of the school corporation.
(C) The principal of the school at which the incident
occurred.
(D) The parent who submitted the complaint and the
parent of the alleged perpetrator of the incident.
(3) Not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the report is
approved by the committee, contact the parent who filed the
complaint to assess whether the resolution was implemented
and effective.
Sec. 6. In a report approved by the committee under section
5(a)(4) of this chapter, the committee may:
(1) include, subject to applicable procedures, required
corrective measures, including:
(A) supervision changes;
(B) student separation;
(C) counseling; or
(D) a disciplinary referral; and
(2) recommend training or prevention strategies to the
administration of the school at which the incident occurred.
Sec. 7. The department shall do the following:
(1) Adopt guidelines and model training materials for
committee members.
(2) Post the guidelines and materials on the department's
website.
Sec. 8. Each school corporation shall ensure members complete
training in accordance with the guidelines adopted by the
department under section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 9. (a) A parent may request a hearing before the governing
body of the school corporation regarding a complaint described in
section 4 of this chapter:
(1) at any time if the school corporation is unable to establish
2026 IN 1107—LS 6492/DI 110


a committee under section 3 of this chapter; or
(2) not later than fifteen (15) calendar days after the date the
parent receives the committee's report under section 5(b) of
this chapter.
(b) If a parent makes a request described in subsection (a), the
governing body of the school corporation shall do the following:
(1) Hold the hearing in executive session under IC 5-14-1.5.
(2) Consider the committee's report, if applicable, and any
testimony or written documentation from the:
(A) parent of the student who filed the complaint;
(B) parent of the alleged perpetrator; and
(C) administration of the school or school corporation.
(3) Not later than fifteen (15) days after the date of the
hearing, issue a written determination affirming, modifying,
or remanding the school or committee resolution of the
incident.
(4) Ensure that the determination is included in the school
corporation's bullying incident records.
Sec. 10. A parent of a targeted student or parent of an alleged
perpetrator may view any video evidence related to a bullying
incident or physical assault involving the student for which a
complaint or request for a hearing has been submitted under this
chapter.
Sec. 11. A school corporation or employee of the school
corporation may not take any disciplinary action or retaliate
against any school staff, student, parent, or witness who
participates in good faith in the filing, investigation, or review of a
complaint under this chapter.
Sec. 12. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to supersede:
(1) reporting requirements under IC 20-33-8-13.5; or
(2) the duty to report child abuse or neglect, as required
under IC 31-33-5.
Sec. 13. The state board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
2026 IN 1107—LS 6492/DI 110